District of Columbia statutes.
5-1303

Service in Armed Forces — Rank or grade preserved; restriction on compensation.

No officer or member of the Metropolitan Police force or of the Fire Department of the District of Columbia shall, by reason of the enactment of § 5-1302, be:

(1)

Reduced in rank or grade; or

(2)

Entitled to any compensation for any period prior to July 1, 1947.

History

July 1, 1947, 61 Stat. 240, ch. 193, § 2

Cross References

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-1103.
1973 Ed., § 4-903.